Utah statutes.
48-2c-404.   Prefiling activities.

A company may not transact business or incur indebtedness, except that which is incidental to its organization or to obtaining subscriptions for or payment of contributions, until its articles of organization have been filed with the division.  Nevertheless, this section may not be interpreted to invalidate any debts, contracts, or liabilities of the company incurred on behalf of the company prior to the filing of its articles of organization with the division.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

